Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 201260-622.01
Golf car vehicle, defined.

Golf car vehicle
means a vehicle that has at least four wheels, has a maximum level ground
speed of less than twenty miles per hour, has a maximum payload capacity of
one thousand two hundred pounds, has a maximum gross vehicle weight of two
thousand five hundred pounds, has a maximum passenger capacity of not more
than four persons, is designed and manufactured for operation on a golf course
for sporting and recreational purposes, and is not being operated within the
boundaries of a golf course.

Laws 2012, LB1155, § 20.
January 1, 2013